Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.120

Appointment of chief administrative law judge.

The governor shall appoint the chief administrative law judge.

[ 1989 c 175 s 35; 1981 c 67 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.